Missouri, session 2026, HB2936.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section 1. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Harrisonville, Cass County, Missouri. The property to
be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
A part of Lot One (1) of the Northwest Quarter of Section 3, Township 44, Range
31, Harrisonville, Cass County, Missouri described as follows: Beginning at the
Northeast corner of that tract of land described in deed of record in Book 558,
Page 396 of the Recorder of Deeds Office, Cass County, Missouri, and being on
the North line of said Lot 1 a distance of 268.55 feet from the Northwest Corner
of said Lot 1; run thence North 89 degrees 36 minutes 50 seconds West along the
North line of said Lot 1 a distance of 200 feet; run thence South 0 degrees 12
minutes 00 seconds West a distance of 435 feet to a point; thence South 89
degrees 30 minutes 10 seconds East 200 feet; run thence North 0 degrees 12
minutes East to the place or point of beginning, a distance of 435 feet, together
with a pertinent easement for roadway purposes over the following described
tract: A part of Lot One (1) of the Northeast Quarter of Section 4, and A part of
Lot One (1) of the Northwest Quarter of Section 3, all in Township 44, Range 31,
Harrisonville, Cass County, Missouri, described as follows: Beginning at the
Northeast corner of Lot 1 of the Northeast Quarter of Section 4, Township 44,
Range 31; running thence North 89 degrees 30 minutes 10 seconds West along
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2936 2
the North line of said Lot 1 a distance of 226.51 feet to the West line of James
Street; run thence South 50 feet; run thence East a distance of 295.06 feet; run
thence North 50 feet to the North line of Lot 1 of the Northwest Quarter of
Section 3, Township 44, Range 31; run thence North 89 degrees 30 minutes 10
seconds West along the North line of said Lot 1 to the place of beginning.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 2. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Kirksville, Adair County, Missouri. The property to be
conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
A TRACT OF LAND SITUATED IN THE NORTHWEST QUARTER OF
SECTION 15, TOWNSHIP 62 NORTH, RANGE 15 WEST, CITY OF
KIRKSVILLE, ADAIR COUNTY, MISSOURI AND BEING MORE
PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
BEGINNING AT A PK NAIL FOUND IN CONCRETE BEING THE
NORTHWEST CORNER OF LOT 1 OF CHARITON SUBDIVISION AND
THE SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF LAHARPE STREET;
THENCE ALONG SAID LOT AS FOLLOWS S00°06'25"W A DISTANCE OF
179.65' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND;
THENCE N89°42'12"E A DISTANCE OF 210.17' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND
AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID LOT;
THENCE S00°06'47"W A DISTANCE OF 317.96' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND
ON THE NORTH LINE OF A SURVEY RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 1000,
PAGE 1;
THENCE ALONG SAID SURVEY AS FOLLOWS: S89°37'55"W A DISTANCE
OF 824.78' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND;
THENCE N00°03'54"E A DISTANCE OF 498.89' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND
ON THE SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF LAHARPE STREET;
THENCE ALONG SAID RIGHT OF WAY LINE, N89°43'39"E A DISTANCE
OF 615.00' TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING.
THE ABOVE TRACT OF LAND CONTAINS 8.57 ACRES MORE OR LESS,
SUBJECT TO EASEMENTS AND RESTRICTIONS OF RECORD, OR NOT
OF RECORD, IF ANY.

HB 2936 3
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 3. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri. The property to
be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Beginning 69 feet North of the Southeast corner of Lot 17, Block 5 in the Original
Plat of the Town of Springfield, Missouri, running thence North 43.8 feet to Olive
Street, thence West 103.2 feet to Baker Arcade, thence South 43.3 feet, thence
East 103.2 feet to point of beginning, all in the City of Springfield, Greene
County, Missouri.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 4. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri. The property to
be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Beginning at a point on the North side of East Walnut Street 431 5/6 feet East of
the Southwest corner of Lot 84, Block 23, of the Original Plat of Springfield,
Missouri, which point is the Southeast corner of James E. Keet's Lot, thence East
along the North side of East Walnut Street to fence of J. L. Carson's Lot, thence
North along said fence and on line with same 240 feet, thence West to the East
line of Keet's Lot, thence South with Keet's East Line to beginning, being 86 feet
front on East Walnut Street, more or less, all in the City of Springfield, Greene
County, Missouri.
Beginning on the North line of East Walnut Street at the Southwest corner of
Bray lot, thence West 82-1/2 feet to the East line of a lot formerly owned by
Charles T. Keet, thence North 240 feet thence West 82-1/2 feet, thence North 27-
1/2 feet, thence East 165 feet, thence South 267 feet to the beginning, all in the
Southeast quarter of the Northwest quarter of Section 24, Township 29, Range
22, except that part deeded in Book 1555, page 1689, described as beginning on

HB 2936 4
the North line of East Walnut Street in Springfield, Missouri, at the Southwest
corner of the Bray Lot, said beginning point being 165.31 feet Southeast of the
Northeast corner of Benton Alley, and Walnut; thence West 82.5 feet to the East
line of lot formerly owned by Charles T. Keet; thence North 240 feet to point of
new beginning; thence West 82.5 feet at an exterior angle of 89 degrees 50 min.,
thence North 24.7 feet at an interior angel of 89 degrees 43 min., thence East 82.4
feet more or less thence South 23.1 feet to point of beginning all in the Southeast
Quarter of the Northwest quarter, Section 24, Range 22.
Beginning on the South side of St. Louis Street at a point fifty (50) feet west of the
Northwest corner of a lot known at one time as the W. J. McDaniel Lot, which
point is now the Northwest corner of the Simmons Lot (formerly the A. J.
Clements lot), thence West along the South side of St. Louis Street fifty (50) feet
to Bryan's Northeast corner, thence South to South Alley now McDaniel Street,
thence East fifty (50) feet to the Southwest corner of the lot formerly belonging to
said Clements, thence North to the beginning, all in the City of Springfield,
Missouri. Also described as Beginning 50 feet West of the Northwest corner of
Lot 1, Kimbroughs Addition, West 50 feet, thence South 222 feet to McDaniel
Street, East 50 feet, North to the beginning.
Commencing at the northeast corner of Walnut and Jefferson Streets; thence
South 87°53'42" East 310.5 feet along the north right-of-way line of Walnut
Street to an iron pin; thence North 0°45'23" West 206.81 feet to an iron pin for a
point of beginning; thence continuing North 0°45'23" West 181.83 feet to a
chiseled "X" in concrete on the South right-of-way line of McDaniel Street;
thence North 89°06' East 107.19 feet along the South right-of-way line of
McDaniel Street to an iron pin; thence South 1°24'33" East 184.71 feet to an iron
pin; thence North 89°23'31" West 109.33 feet to the point of beginning.
Containing 0.45 acres in the City of Springfield, Greene County, Missouri.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 5. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Festus, Jefferson County, Missouri. The property to be
conveyed is more particularly described as follows:

HB 2936 5
Part of a larger tract of land described in Deed Book 70 at Page 115, lying in
United States Survey Number 910, Township 40 North, Range 5 East of the Fifth
Principal Meridian, Jefferson County, Missouri. Being further described as
follows:
Beginning at a point lying South 70°37'31" West, a distance of 69.85 feet from the
Northeast Corner of said larger tract; thence South 25°30'00" East, a distance of
58.27 feet; thence South 82°46'45" East, a distance of 17.98 feet to the beginning
of a curve tangent to said line; thence easterly and southeasterly a distance of
94.85 feet along the curve concave to the southwest, having a radius of 154.00 feet
and a central angle of 35°17'23"; thence South 47°29'22" East tangent to said
curve, a distance of 37.74 feet to the beginning of a curve tangent to said line;
thence southeasterly a distance of 28.64 feet along the curve concave to the
southwest, having a radius of 214.00 feet and a central angle of 7°40'02"; thence
South 39°49'21" East tangent to said curve, a distance of 159.54 feet to the
beginning of a curve tangent to said line; thence southeasterly and southerly a
distance of 100.05 feet along the curve concave to the southwest, having a radius
of 314.00 feet and a central angle of 18°15'22"; thence South 21°33'59" East
tangent to said curve, a distance of 126.81 feet to the beginning of a curve tangent
to said line; thence southerly and southeasterly a distance of 85.41 feet along the
curve concave to the northeast, having a radius of 386.00 feet and a central angle
of 12°40'38"; thence South 34°14'37" East tangent to said curve, a distance of
177.22 feet; thence North 55°45'23" East, a distance of 94.67 feet; thence South
38°40'29" East, a distance of 50.00 feet; thence South 28°31'17" West, a distance
of 168.37 feet; thence North 61°20'49" West, a distance of 50.00 feet to the
beginning of a curve radial to said line; thence northeasterly, northerly and
northwesterly a distance of 48.30 feet along the curve concave to the west, having
a radius of 44.00 feet and a central angle of 62°53'48"; thence North 34°14'37"
West tangent to said curve, a distance of 220.45 feet to the beginning of a curve
tangent to said line; thence northwesterly and northerly a distance of 96.47 feet
along the curve concave to the northeast, having a radius of 436.00 feet and a
central angle of 12°40'38"; thence North 21°33'59" West tangent to said curve, a
distance of 126.81 feet to the beginning of a curve tangent to said line; thence
northerly and northwesterly a distance of 84.12 feet along the curve concave to
the southwest, having a radius of 264.00 feet and a central angle of 18°15'22";
thence North 39°49'21" West tangent to said curve, a distance of 159.54 feet to
the beginning of a curve tangent to said line; thence northwesterly a distance of
21.95 feet along the curve concave to the southwest, having a radius of 164.00 feet

HB 2936 6
and a central angle of 7°40'02"; thence North 47°29'22" West tangent to said
curve, a distance of 37.74 feet to the beginning of a curve tangent to said line;
thence northwesterly and westerly a distance of 64.06 feet along the curve
concave to the southwest, having a radius of 104.00 feet and a central angle of 35°
17'23"; thence North 82°46'45" West tangent to said curve, a distance of 56.40
feet; thence North 53°01'15" West, a distance of 36.34 feet; thence North 16°
26'26" East, a distance of 68.06 feet; thence North 70°37'31" East, a distance of
30.83 feet to the end of easement.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 6. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Doniphan, Ripley County, Missouri. The property to
be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
All of Lot Number Nine, in Block Number Three, in Cox’s Addition to the City of
Doniphan, Missouri.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 7. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Higginsville, Lafayette County, Missouri. The property
to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Tract 1:
A tract of land in the Northwest ¼ of the Northwest ¼ of Section 12, Township 49
North of the Base line, Range 26, West of the Fifth Principal Meridian, in
Higginsville, Lafayette County, Missouri, described as follows: Beginning at a
point 529.00 feet West and 30.0 feet South of the Northeast corner of said
Northwest ¼ of Northwest ¼ of Section 12, Township 49 North, Range 26 West;
thence from the point of beginning West parallel to and 30.0 feet South of the
North line of said ¼ ¼ section 444.42 feet to a point; thence South 490.08 feet to a
point, thence East 444.42 feet to a point 400.00 feet West of the Westerly right of

HB 2936 7
way line of Missouri State Highway No. 13; thence North parallel with said 13
Highway right of way 490.08 feet to the point of beginning, containing 5 acres,
more or less, EXCEPT that part, if any, in roads, public or private.
Tract 2:
A tract of land located in the Northwest ¼ of the Northwest ¼ of Section 12,
Township 49 North of the Base line, Range 26 West of the Fifth Principal
Meridian, in Higginsville, Lafayette County, Missouri, described as follows:
Beginning at a point 529.00 feet West and 520.08 feet South from the Northeast
corner of said Northwest ¼ of Northwest ¼ of Section 12, Township 49 North,
Range 26, West; thence from the point of beginning 444.42 feet West to a point;
thence South 197 feet to a point; thence East 444.42 feet to a point; thence North
197 feet to the point of beginning.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 8. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Jefferson, Missouri. The property to be conveyed is
more particularly described as follows:
PART OF THE WEST HALF OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF
SECTION 34, TOWNSHIP 45 NORTH, RANGE 12 WEST, IN THE CITY
OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, MORE PARTICULARLY
DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
FROM THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE WEST HALF OF THE
SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SAID SECTION 34; THENCE SOUTH 05
DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13 SECONDS EAST ALONG THE EAST LINE OF
THE WEST HALF OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SAID SECTION 34
AND THE WEST LINE OF RIVERVIEW CEMETERY, 2222.85 FEET TO
THE POINT OF BEGINNING FOR THIS DESCRIPTION; THENCE
CONTINUING SOUTH 05 DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13 SECONDS EAST
ALONG SAID WEST LINE OF RIVERVIEW CEMETERY AND THE EAST
LINE OF THE WEST HALF OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SECTION
34, 400.12 FEET TO THE NORTHERLY LINE OF WEST MAIN STREET;
THENCE WESTERLY ALONG THE NORTHERLY LINE OF SAID WEST
MAIN STREET, ON A CURVE TO THE LEFT, HAVING A RADIUS OF

HB 2936 8
1940.08 FEET, A DISTANCE OF 226.85 FEET; THENCE SOUTH 82
DEGREES 25 MINUTES 40 SECONDS WEST ALONG THE NORTH LINE
OF SAID WEST MAIN STREET, 73.40 FEET TO THE EAST LINE OF
HOOVER ROAD; THENCE NORTH 05 DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13
SECONDS WEST ALONG THE EAST LINE OF HOOVER ROAD, 396.31
FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE EAST LINE OF HOOVER ROAD, NORTH
84 DEGREES 13 MINUTES 47 SECONDS EAST, 300.00 FEET TO THE
POINT OF BEGINNING.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 9. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell, transfer,
grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
in property located in the city of Richwoods, Washington County, Missouri. The
property to be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:
Tract #1: Part of the Northeast Quarter (NE1/4) of the Northwest Quarter
(NW1/4) of Section Fourteen (14), Township Thirty-nine (39) North, Range One
(1) East particularly described as follows:
Commencing at a pile of stones marking the Northwest corner of Section
Fourteen (14) Township Thirty-nine (39) North, Range One (1) East, thence
South 63 degrees 38 minutes East 1533.24 feet to an iron pin set in concrete for
the Northwest corner of the herein conveyed tract or parcel and the true point of
beginning; thence from said true point of beginning North 70 degrees East, at
125.00 feet pass an iron pin set in concrete a total distance of 250.00 feet to an
iron pin set in concrete for the Northeast corner; thence South 20 degrees East, at
328.9 feet pass an iron pin set in concrete on the North boundary of Missouri
State Farm to Market Road “T” a total distance of 359.7 feet to a point on the
centerline of said road for the Southeast corner; thence South 64 degrees 40
minutes West 0.75 feet along the centerline of said road to a point marking the
P.C. of a curve; thence on a curve to the left along said centerline whose interior
angle is 39 degrees 03 minutes and whose radius is 410.28 feet and whose tangent
bearing is South 64 degrees 40 minutes West for a distance of 279.62 feet to a
point for the Southwest corner; thence North 20 degrees West, at 53.81 feet pass
an iron pin set in concrete, a total distance of 474.41 feet to the point of
beginning, containing 2.07 acres, more or less, exclusive of that portion lying

HB 2936 9
within the public road. All bearings recited herein are based on True North as
determined by Solar Observation.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 10. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in Jackson County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed
is more particularly described as follows:
All of the Southwest Quarter (SW ¼) of Section 18, Township 48, Range 31, in
Lee’s Summit, Jackson County, Missouri, described as follows: Beginning at a
point on the North line of said quarter-section 434.94 feet East of the Northwest
corner thereof; thence East along said North line 601.83 feet; then South, at right
angles from the last described course 601.83 feet, thence West, at right angles
from the last described course 601.83 feet; thence North, at right angles from the
last described course 601.83 feet to the point of beginning; containing 362,199
square feet, or approximately 8.315 acres.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 11. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in Marion County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed
is more particularly described as follows:
Commencing at a found D.N.R. Monument marking the Northeast corner of
Section 36, Township 57 North, Range 5 West; Thence along the Eastern line of
said Section 36, South 00ᴼ 51’ 50” West 1321.42’ to a found rebar with
Aluminum Cap marking the Southeast corner of the Northeast Quarter of the
Northeast Quarter of said Section 36, said rebar also marking the POINT OF
BEGINNING of the tract of land herein described; Thence continuing along
aforesaid Eastern Line of Section 36, South 00ᴼ 49’ 21” West 876.35’ to a set 5/8”
rebar with Aluminum Cap on the Western right of way line of U.S. Highway 61,
said rebar being 130.62’ right of and at right angle to U.S. Highway 61

HB 2936 10
Centerline Station 84+59.57; Thence departing said Eastern line of Section 36
and along the Western right of way line of U.S. Highway 61 the following; South
27ᴼ 43’ 09” West 9.90’ to a set 5/8” rebar being 127.60’ right of and at right angle
to U.S. Highway 61 Centerline Station 84+69; Thence South 37ᴼ 03’ 27” West
111.50’ to a set 5/8” rebar with Aluminum Cap, said rebar being 111.30’ right of
and at right angle to U.S. Highway 61 Centerline Station 85+79.30; Thence South
42ᴼ 33’ 42” West 381.19’ to a set 5/8” rebar with Aluminum Cap, said rebar
being 92.00’ right of and at right angle to U.S. Highway 61 Centerline Station 89
+60; Thence South 45ᴼ 27’ 49” West 543.30’ to a set 5/8” rebar with Aluminum
Cap, said rebar being 92.00’ right of and at right angle to U.S. Highway 61
Centerline PC Station 95+03.30; Thence South 44ᴼ 13’ 49” West 250.64’ to a set
5/8” rebar with Aluminum Cap, said rebar being 92.00’ right of and at right
angle to U.S. Highway 61 Centerline Station 97+50; Thence South 51ᴼ 03’ 45”
West 100.82’ to a set 5/8” rebar with Aluminum Cap, said rebar being 107.00’
right of and at right angle to U.S. Highway 61 Centerline Station 98+48; Thence
South 40ᴼ 30’ 06” West 186.47’ to a set 5/8” rebar with Aluminum Cap on the
Northern Line of Strawberry Hill as recorded in Plat Book 5 Page 45 of the
Marion County Records, said rebar being 105.05’ right of and at right angle to
U.S Highway 61 Centerline Station 100+31.08; Thence departing aforesaid
Western right of way line of U.S. Highway 61 and along said Northern line of
Strawberry Hill and its extension, North 89ᴼ 35’ 49” West 419.99’ to a found Iron
Pipe in Westover Road; Thence departing said Northern line of Strawberry Hill
and its extension and with Westover Road the following, North 10ᴼ 40’ 56” West
205.59’ to a found Iron Pipe; Thence North 73ᴼ 11’ 24” West 693.21’ to a found
Railroad Spike on the Eastern line of Lot 12 of Tilden in the Marion County
Records; Thence departing said Westover Road and along the Eastern,
Southern, and Western lines of said Lot 12 of Tilden the following, South 00ᴼ
59’ 05” West 156.25’ to a found Iron Pipe; Thence North 89ᴼ 22’ 32” West
417.46’ to a set 5/8” rebar with Aluminum Cap; Thence North 00ᴼ 59’ 05” East
450.77’ to a found D.N.R. Monument marking the Center of Section 36;
Thence departing aforesaid Western line of Lot 12 of Tilden, Along the North-
South Center Section Line of Section 36, North 01ᴼ 12’ 56” East 1322.51’ to a
found 2” Metal Corner Post marking the Northwest Corner of the Southwest
Quarter of the Northeast Quarter of Section 36; Thence departing said North-
South Center Section Line, along the Northern Line of the Southwest Quarter of
the Northeast of Section 36, South 89ᴼ 51’ 56” East 1304.92’ to a set 5/8” rebar
with Aluminum Cap marking the Northeast Corner of the Southwest Quarter of

HB 2936 11
the Northeast Quarter of Section 36; Thence departing said Northern Line of the
Southwest Quarter of the Northeast Quarter and along the Western line of the
Northeast Quarter of the Northeast Quarter of Section 36, North 00ᴼ 50’ 17”
East 447.12’ to a found Iron Pipe; Thence departing said Western line of the
Northeast Quarter of the Northeast Quarter, South 77ᴼ 19’ 42” East 1052.74’ to a
found 5/8” iron pipe; Thence South 51ᴼ 03’ 36” East 348.77’ to the Beginning
Point.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
Section 12. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell,
transfer, grant, convey, remise, release, and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of
Missouri in property located in Marion County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed
is more particularly described as follows:
Commencing at a found concrete monument marking the East Quarter corner of
Section 36, Township 57 North, Range 5 West; Thence along the east line of said
Section 36, South 01ᴼ 26’ 10” West 134.71’ to a point; Thence departing said
section line North 88ᴼ 33’ 50” West 208.75’ to a set 5/8” rebar with Aluminum
Cap, at the intersection of the Eastern right of way line of U.S. Highway 61 and
the Western line of Link View as recorded in Plat Book 6 Page 5 of the Marion
County Records, said rebar being 130.46’ left of and at right angle to U.S.
Highway 61 Centerline Station 90+23.05 and said rebar marking the Point of
Beginning of the tract of land herein described; Thence along said Western line
of Link View, South 01ᴼ 26’ 10” West 539.23’ to a set 5/8” rebar with Aluminum
Cap, Said rebar being North 01ᴼ 26’ 10” East 30.00’ from the intersection of said
Western line of Link View and the Northern line of Strawberry Hill as recorded
in Plat Book 5 Page 45 of the Marion County Records;
Thence departing said Western line of Link View, South 79ᴼ 08’ 04” West 153.50’
to a set 5/8” rebar with Aluminum Cap on Aforesaid Northern line of
Strawberry Hill; Thence along said Northern Line of Strawberry Hill, North 89ᴼ
35’ 49” West 336.39’ to a set 5/8” rebar with Aluminum Cap on the Aforesaid
Eastern right of way line of U.S. Highway 61, said rebar being 175.78’ left of and
at right angle to U.S. Highway 61 Centerline Station 97+85.39; Thence departing
said Northern line of Strawberry Hill and along said Eastern right of way line of
U.S. Highway 61, North 37ᴼ 38’ 59” East 275.88’ to a set 5/8” rebar with

HB 2936 12
Aluminum Cap, said rebar being 145.00’ left of and at right angle to U.S.
Highway 61 Centerline PC Station 95+03.30; Thence continuing along said right
of way line North 43ᴼ 43’ 45” East 480.47’ to the Beginning Point.
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the terms and conditions for the
conveyance as the commissioner deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may
include, but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and the time, place,
and terms of the conveyance.
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the instrument of conveyance.
✔